Illinois, session 104th, HB2331.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Government Officer Compensation Act 5is amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 145/2)7    Sec. 2. Time and manner of fixing compensation. 8    (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 9compensation of elected officers of school districts and units 10of local government, including home rule units, which 11compensation is to be fixed by that school district or unit of 12local government, shall be fixed at least 180 days before the 13beginning of the terms of the officers whose compensation is 14to be fixed.15    (b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), the 16compensation of county elected officers shall be fixed by 17ordinance or resolution of the county board or the board of 18county commissioners. In the ordinance or resolution fixing 19the compensation of county elected officers under subsection 20(a), the county board shall separately list each stipend an 21elected officer is expected to receive in addition to the 22compensation to be paid by the county. The stipends listed 23shall include, but are not limited to, stipends expected to be   HB2331- 2 -LRB104 10746 RTM 20825 b1received under:2        Section 3-40 of the Property Tax Code.3        Section 4-20 of the Property Tax Code.4        Section 3-10007 of the Counties Code.5        Section 4-2001 of the Counties Code.6        Section 4-6001 of the Counties Code.7        Section 4-6002 of the Counties Code.8        Section 4-6003 of the Counties Code.9        Section 4-8002 of the Counties Code.10        Section 27.3 of the Clerks of Courts Act. 11    (c) As used in this Section, "compensation" means all 12remuneration for service as an elected officer, including 13wages, salary, health insurance benefits, and all other 14payments made on behalf of or for the benefit of the elected 15officer for service as an elected officer.16    This subsection shall be construed liberally to require 17all elected officer compensation to be fixed in accordance 18with this Section.19(Source: P.A. 102-48, eff. 7-9-21.)